Tennessee, session 114, SB0533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-2-152, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting instead:
(b) If a prisoner is released to perform unpaid work, then the entity utilizing the
prisoner for work shall pay the costs of the electronic monitoring device required
pursuant to subsection (a). If a prisoner is released for paid employment, then the
prisoner shall pay the costs of the electronic monitoring device required pursuant to
subsection (a).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 41-2-152(a), is amended by deleting
the language "beginning January 1, 2024,".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0533
001721
- 1 -